Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 10 Removal of Conservator for Other Reasons

29-5-90.
Resignation of conservator; requirement of petition; alternative conservator; notice to interested individuals; order of appointment of successor conservator.

A conservator or the duly authorized guardian, conservator, or attorney in fact of a conservator, acting on behalf of the conservator, may resign upon petition to the court showing to the satisfaction of the court that:

The conservator is unable to continue serving due to age, illness, infirmity, or other good cause;

Greater burdens have devolved upon the office of conservator than those that were originally contemplated or should have been contemplated when the conservator was qualified and the additional burdens work a hardship upon the conservator;

Disagreement exists between the ward and the conservator or between the guardian and the conservator in respect of the conservator’s management of the ward’s property, which disagreement and conflict appear to be detrimental to the ward;

The resignation of the conservator will result in or permit substantial financial benefit to the ward; or

The resignation would not be disadvantageous to the ward.

The petition for resignation shall include the name of a suitable person who is willing to accept the conservatorship.

The court shall appoint legal counsel for the ward and personal service of the petition for resignation shall be made upon the ward and the ward’s legal counsel. Service shall be made by first-class mail to the guardian of the ward, if any, the surety on the conservator’s bond, and to the following persons whose whereabouts are known and who must be persons other than the resigning conservator or the proposed successor conservator:

The spouse of the ward; and

All adult children of the ward; or

If there is no adult child, then at least two adults in the following order of priority:

Lineal descendants of the ward;

Parents and siblings of the ward; and

Friends of the ward.

If, after such hearing as the court deems appropriate, the court is satisfied that the petition for the resignation of the conservator and the appointment of the successor conservator should be granted, the court shall enter an order appointing the successor conservator in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-5-101 and shall accept the resignation, subject to the resigning conservator turning over to the successor conservator all property of the ward held by the conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

29-5-91.
Death of conservator; notice to interested individuals; order appointing successor conservator.

In the event of the death of a conservator and upon the petition of an interested person or upon the court’s own motion, the court shall appoint a successor conservator. The court shall appoint legal counsel for the ward and personal service of the petition shall be made upon the ward and the ward’s legal counsel. Notice shall be given by first-class mail to the guardian of the ward, if any, the surety on the conservator’s bond, the personal representative of the deceased conservator, if any, and to the following persons whose whereabouts are known and who must be persons other than the proposed successor conservator:

The spouse of the ward; and

All adult children of the ward; or

If there is no adult child, then at least two adults in the following order of priority:

Lineal descendants of the ward;

Parents and siblings of the ward; and

Friends of the ward.

After such hearing as the court deems appropriate, the court shall enter an order appointing a successor conservator in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-5-101 and requiring the personal representative of the deceased conservator to turn over to the successor conservator all property of the ward held by the conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-91

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-92.
Conservator required to answer charges; authority of court; effect on other proceedings.

Upon the petition of any interested person or whenever it appears to the court that good cause may exist to revoke or suspend the letters of conservatorship or to impose sanctions, the court shall cite the conservator to answer the charge. The court shall investigate the allegations and may require such accounting as the court deems appropriate. The court may appoint a temporary substitute conservator to take possession of and administer the ward’s property during the investigation.

Upon investigation, the court may, in its discretion:

Revoke or suspend the letters of conservatorship;

Require additional security;

Require the conservator to appear and submit to a settlement of accounts following the procedure set forth in Code Section 29-5-81, whether or not the conservator has first resigned or been removed and whether or not a successor conservator has been appointed;

Reduce or deny compensation to the conservator or impose any other sanction or sanctions as the court deems appropriate; and

Issue such other orders as in the court’s judgment are appropriate under the circumstances of the case.

The revocation or suspension of letters of conservatorship shall not abate any action pending for or against the conservator. The successor conservator shall be made a party to the action in the manner provided in Code Section 9-11-25.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-92

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-93.
Cause of action for breach of fiduciary duty.

If a conservator commits a breach of fiduciary duty or threatens to commit a breach of fiduciary duty, a ward or an interested person on behalf of the ward shall have a cause of action as appropriate:

To recover damages;

To compel performance of the conservator’s duties;

To enjoin the commission of a breach of fiduciary duty; or

To compel the redress of a breach of fiduciary duty by payment of money or otherwise.

When the ward’s assets are misapplied and can be traced into the hands of persons who have notice of the misapplication, a trust shall attach to the assets.

The provision of remedies for breach of fiduciary duty by this Code section does not prevent resort to any other appropriate remedy provided by statute or common law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-93

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-94.
Statute of limitations.

All actions against a conservator, except on a conservator’s bond, shall be brought within six years of the termination of the conservatorship of the ward, except as provided in Code Section 9-3-90.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-94

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.